Massachusetts, session 194th, H3140.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “fifteen”, in line 434, the following words:- ; and
meals served by a veterans’ organization; provided, that the meals are: (i) furnished without
charge, (ii) served at a potluck event, as defined in section 328A of section 94; (iii) served at
price equal to the cost of the component food; or (iv) served by a veterans’ organization for
which the sale of meals accounts for less than 20 per cent of the veterans’ organization annual
revenue.
of 1